Arkansas, session 2025, HB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2006(a)(1)(B), concerning an annual
reporting of a student's statewide assessment test results, is amended to
read as follows:
(B) The A private school, as defined in § 6-15-2907, and a
school district board of directors shall report to the parent, guardian, or
the student, if the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, the
student's results on each statewide assessment test.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907(a), concerning the implementation
*TNL060*
01/22/2025 4:08:41 PM TNL060

HB1542
of a statewide student assessment system, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
implement a statewide student assessment system to be administered by
Arkansas public schools and private schools on a schedule determined by the
State Board of Education that includes the following components:
(1)(A) Developmentally appropriate measurements or assessments
for kindergarten through grade two (K-2) in literacy and mathematics;
(2)(A)(B)(i) High-quality, evidence-based literacy screeners for
kindergarten through grade three (K-3).
(B)(i)(ii)(a) The division shall identify the
literacy screeners required under subdivision (a)(2)(A) subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section, which shall meet the requirements of § 6-41-603
and may be the same screener used for dyslexia screening.
(ii)(b) The literacy screeners required under
subdivision (a)(2)(A) subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be
utilized to determine student progression in reading in kindergarten through
grade three (K-3) and shall be:
(a)(1) Given during the first thirty
(30) days of the school year;
(b)(2) Repeated, if indicated, midyear;
and
(c)(3) Given at the end of the school
year.
(iii)(c) The division shall collect and publish
aggregated public school district, open-enrollment public charter school, and
overall state literacy assessment results annually by October 1;
(3)(C) Assessments to measure English language arts,
mathematics, and science as identified by the state board;
(4)(D) Assessments of English proficiency of all English
learners; and
(5)(A)(E)(i) Assessments to measure college and career
readiness.
(B)(i)(ii)(a) A public school or private school that
serves a student in grades ten through twelve (10-12) shall administer
college and career readiness assessments, including a career readiness
assessment that leads to a nationally recognized work readiness certificate,
01/22/2025 4:08:41 PM TNL060

HB1542
as determined by the state board to each student before he or she graduates
from high school.
(ii)(b) A career readiness assessment under
subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) subdivision (a)(1)(E)(ii)(a) of this section may
include without limitation the ACT WorkKeys National Career Readiness
Certificate (NCRC).
(C)(i)(iii)(a) Public school districts may offer
additional college and career readiness assessments for students in grades
ten through twelve (10-12) at no cost to the student by using public school
district funding, including without limitation Enhanced Student Achievement
Funding under § 6-20-2305.
(ii)(b) A Platinum, Gold, Silver, or Bronze
credential through the ACT WorkKeys National Career Readiness Certificate
(NCRC) shall be used by an institution of higher education as transcribable
credit toward the attainment of a postsecondary technical degree.
(2) However, any costs associated with the administration of a
statewide student assessment system by a private school shall be entirely
covered by the private school.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907(d)-(f), concerning requirements
regarding the statewide student assessment system, are amended to read as
follows:
(d) A public school district or private school, at its own expense,
may assess the academic achievement and growth of students by other means in
addition to the required statewide student assessment system.
(e) All students enrolled in a public school district or private
school shall participate in the statewide student assessment system.
(f) Public school district boards of directors and private schools
shall not establish school calendars that limit or interfere with student
participation in the statewide student assessment system.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907(h), concerning requirements
regarding the statewide student assessment system, is amended to read as
follows:
(h) The division shall provide for statewide student assessments that
are:
01/22/2025 4:08:41 PM TNL060

HB1542
(1) Valid and reliable;
(2) Obtained or developed, as appropriate, through contracts and
project agreements;
(3) Aligned to the Arkansas academic standards; and
(4) Scored and returned for public school, and public school
district, and private school use by August 1 of each year.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907(i)(1), concerning statewide
student assessment system security and confidentiality, is amended to read as
follows:
(i)(1) Public schools, public school districts, private schools, and
educators shall maintain assessment security and confidentiality.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907(i)(3), concerning breach of
security and confidentiality requirements for the statewide student
assessment system, is amended to read as follows:
(3) A violation by a public school, a public school district, a
private school, or an educator of the security or confidential integrity of
any test or assessment may result in action by the state board under §§ 6-17-
410 and 6-17-428 or under the rules promulgated by the state board to
implement this subchapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907(l), concerning the analysis and
reporting of student performance data, is amended to read as follows:
(l) Public school districts and private schools shall analyze and
report student performance data to students, parents, and the community, if
the disclosures are not in conflict with applicable federal law and state
law.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2907, concerning the implementation of
a statewide student assessment system, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(m) As used in this section, "private school" means a nonpublic school
that:
(1) Offers instruction for students in kindergarten through
grade twelve (K-12) in this state; and
01/22/2025 4:08:41 PM TNL060

HB1542
(2) Receives any type of state funding in any amount.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2909(a), concerning dissemination of
personally identifiable information with regard to the public availability of
test instruments and scores, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Any material containing the personally identifiable information,
including without limitation identifiable scores, of individual students on
any test taken under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be:
(1) Considered a public record within the meaning of the Freedom
of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.; or
(2) Disseminated or otherwise made available to the public by a
member of the State Board of Education, an employee of the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education, a member of the board of directors of a
school district, an employee of a school district, an administrator or
employee of a private school, or any other person, except as permitted under
the provisions of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20
U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2017.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-237. Private school — Admittance requirements.
(a)(1) A private school shall admit each student who:
(A) Applies for admission to the private school; and
(B) Intends to use state funds to cover the costs associated
with admittance and attendance at the private school.
(2)(A) A private school that accepts state funds may claim a
lack of capacity to admit a student who applies for admission to the private
school only if the private school has reached the maximum student-to-teacher
ratio permitted under federal law or other applicable state or federal rules.
(B) On or before May 31, a private school that accepts
state funds shall submit to the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education a report detailing its capacity for the upcoming school year.
(b) As used in this section, "state funds" means without limitation
the use of any form of state funds awarded to a student, including without
limitation state funds awarded to a student under the following programs:
(1) The Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program Act, §
01/22/2025 4:08:41 PM TNL060

HB1542
6-18-2301 et seq.; and
(2) The Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program,
§ 6-18-2501 et seq.

































01/22/2025 4:08:41 PM TNL060